West Virginia, session 2026, SB528.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. THE GOVERNOR. §5-1-25. Designation of daylight saving time as official time. Daylight saving time shall be the statewide official time, commencing at two o’clock antemeridian on the second Sunday of March and terminating at two o’clock antemeridian on the first Sunday of November; this time shall apply to all public schools, institutions of higher learning, agencies, departments and political subdivisions of the state and shall be in conformity with the acts of the Congress of the United States relating to daylight saving time. The advanced time, as defined by the acts of the Congress of the United States relating to daylight saving time and commonly referred to as eastern daylight time, shall be the year-round official time of the State of West Virginia. This time shall apply to all public offices, schools, businesses, and other entities within the state. This section shall become effective only upon the enactment of federal legislation permitting states to observe daylight saving time on a permanent, year-round basis.